Washington statutes.
RCW 10.61.010

Conviction of lesser crime.

Upon the trial of an indictment or information, the defendant may be convicted of the crime charged therein, or of a lesser degree of the same crime, or of an attempt to commit the crime so charged, or of an attempt to commit a lesser degree of the same crime. Whenever the jury shall find a verdict of guilty against a person so charged, they shall in their verdict specify the degree or attempt of which the accused is guilty.

[ 1909 c 249 s 11; RRS s 2263. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: (i) 1891 c 28 s 75; Code 1881 s 1097; 1854 p 120 s 122; RRS s 2167, now codified as RCW 10.61.003. (ii) 1891 c 28 s 76; Code 1881 s 1098; 1854 p 120 s 123; RRS s 2168, now codified as RCW 10.61.006.] [SLC-RO-11]